pt-PT: Tipo de ponta: Cabo; Cinzel; Barbela dupla; Arpão; Paralisadora; Barbela única; Deslizante; Com mola; Tridente; Outro
es: Tipo de punta: Cable; Cincel; Doble púa; Arpón; Paralizador; Una púa; Deslizante; Con resorte; Tridente; Otros
sv: Spetstyp: Kabel; Mejsel; Dubbel hulling; Harpun; Paralysator; Enkel hulling; Slip; Fjäderladdad; Treudd; Övrigt
fi: Kärkityyppi: Kaapeli; Taltta; Kaksipiikkinen; Harppuuna; Paralysoija; Yksipiikkinen; Liuku; Jousikuormitteinen; Kolmikärkinen; Muu
fr: Type de pointe: Câble; Burin; Double barbillon; Harpon; Paralyseur; Barbillon simple; Glissante; À ressort; Trident; Autre
sk-SK: Typ hrotu: Kábel; Sekáč; Dvojitý osteň; Harpúna; Paralyzér; Jeden osteň; Viacdielny; Odpružený; Trojzubec; Iné
hu: Hegy típusa: Kábel; Véső; Dupla tüskés; Szigony; Bénító; Egytüskés; Csúszó; Rugós; Háromágú; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de ponta: Cabo; Formão; Farpa dupla; Arpão; Paralisadora; Farpa única; Deslizante; Com mola; Tridente; Outro
zh-TW: 尖端類型: 纜線; 鑿型; 雙倒鉤; 魚叉; 癱瘓; 單倒鉤; 卡瓦; 彈簧式; 三叉戟; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta vrha: Kabelski; Kosi; Dvostruki zubac; Harpun; Paralizator; Jednostruki zubac; Slip; S oprugom; Trozubac; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta konice: Na kablu; Kljukasta; Dvojna loputa; Harpuna; Paralizatorska; Ena loputa; Natična; Vzmetna; Tri-zoba; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип накрайник: Кабел; Длето; Двоен шип; Харпун; Парализатор; Единичен шип; Приплъзване; Пружинен; Тризъбец; Други
ro-RO: Tip vârf: Clasic; Daltă; Doi țepi; Harpon; Cu efect de paralizare; Un sigur țep; Glisant; Încărcat cu arc; Trident; Altele
nl: Tiptype: Kabel; Beitel; Dubbele weerhaak; Harpoen; Paralyzer; Enkele weerhaak; Slip; Veerbelast; Drietand; Andere
vi: Loại đầu: Cáp; Đục; Ngạnh đôi; Lao móc; Máy làm tê liệt; Ngạnh đơn; Trượt; Chịu tải bằng lò xo; Đinh ba; Khác
ja: 先端の形状: ケーブル; チッセル; ダブルバーブ; 銛; パラライザー; シングルバーブ; スリップ; スプリング式; トライデント; その他
cs: Typ koncovky: Kabel; Dláto; Dvojitý osten; Harpuna; Paralyzér; Jednoduchý osten; Kluzná špička; Pružinová; Trojzubec; Jiné
zh-CN: 尖端类型: 线缆; 凿子; 双倒刺; 鱼叉; Paralyzer; 单倒刺; 滑竿; 弹簧承载; 三叉戟; 其他
lt-LT: Antgalio tipas: Su kabeliu; Kampinis; Su dviem atšakomis; Harpūnas; Prismeigimo; Vienšakis; Atsiskiriantis; Spyruoklinis; Trišakis; Kita
th: ประเภทส่วนปลาย: เคเบิล; หัวตัด; ปลายแหลมคู่; ฉมวก; พาราไลเซอร์; ปลายแหลมเดียว; ลื่น; แบบหัวสปริง; Trident; อื่นๆ
da: Spidstype: Kabel; Mejsel; Dobbelt modhager; Harpun; Lammer; Enkelt modhager; Slip; Fjederbelastet; Trident; Andet
it: Tipo di punta: Cavo; Scalpello; Doppio barbiglio; Arpione; Paralizzatore; Barbiglio singolo; Scorrimento; Caricato a molla; Tridente; Altro
en: Tip type: Cable; Chisel; Double barb; Harpoon; Paralyzer; Single barb; Slip; Spring-loaded; Trident; Other
el: Τύπος άκρου (μύτης): Σύρμα; Σμίλη; Διπλό μπάσο; Καμάκι; Παραλύων; Μονό μπάσο; Μεσοφόρι; με ελατήριο; Τρίαινα; Άλλο
de: Spitzentyp: Kabel; Meißel; Doppelter Widerhaken; Harpune; Paralyzer; Einzelner Widerhaken; Unterhose; Gefedert; Dreizack; Sonstiges
ru: Вид наконечника: Кабель; Скошенный; С двумя зубцами; Гарпун; Парализатор; С одним зубцом; Скользящий; Подпружиненный; С тремя зубцами; Другой
tr: Uç Türü: Kablo; Keski; Çift kancalı; Zıpkın; Paralizör; Tek kancalı; Slip; Yay yüklü; Üç dişli mızrak; Diğer
ko: 팁 유형: 케이블; 끌; 더블 바브; 작살; 마비제; 싱글 바브; 슬립; 스프링 탑재; 삼지창; 기타
nb: Tupptype: Kabel; Meisel; Dobbel mothak; Harpun; Paralysator; Enkel mothak; Slip; Fjærbelastet; Trident; Annet
pl: Typ końcówki: Kabel; Przecinak; Podwójne zadziory; Harpun; Paralizator; Pojedyncze zadziory; Poślizg; Sprężyna; Trójząb; Inne